North Carolina statutes. Chapter 148. State Prison System.
Article 3. Labor of Prisoners.
§ 148-37.
Additional facilities authorized; contractual arrangements. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

Subject to the provisions of

G.S. 143-341

, the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety may establish additional facilities for use by the Division, such facilities to be either of a permanent type of construction or of a temporary or movable type as the Division may find most advantageous to the particular needs, to the end that the prisoners under its supervision may be so distributed throughout the State as to facilitate individualization of treatment designed to prepare them for lawful living in the community where they are most likely to reside after their release from prison. For this purpose, the Division may purchase or lease sites and suitable lands adjacent thereto and erect necessary buildings thereon, or purchase or lease existing facilities, all within the limits of allotments as approved by the Department of Administration.

The Secretary of Public Safety may contract with the proper official of the United States or of any county or city of this State for the confinement of federal prisoners after they have been sentenced, county, or city prisoners in facilities of the State prison system or for the confinement of State prisoners in any county or any city facility located in North Carolina, or any facility of the United States Bureau of Prisons, when to do so would most economically and effectively promote the purposes served by the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety. Except as otherwise provided, any contract made under the authority of this subsection shall be for a period of not more than two years, and shall be renewable from time to time for a period not to exceed two years. Contracts made under the authority of this subsection for the confinement of State prisoners in local or district confinement facilities may be for a period of not more than 10 years and renewable from time to time for a period not to exceed 10 years, and shall be subject to the approval of the Council of State and the Department of Administration after consultation with the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations. Contracts for receiving federal, county and city prisoners shall provide for reimbursing the State in full for all costs involved. The financial provisions shall have the approval of the Department of Administration before the contract is executed. Payments received under such contracts shall be deposited in the State treasury for the use of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety. Such payments are hereby appropriated to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety as a supplementary fund to compensate for the additional care and maintenance of such prisoners as are received under such contracts.

(b1)

Recodified as

G.S. 148-37.2

by Session Laws 2001-84, s. 1, effective May 17, 2001.

In addition to the authority contained in subsections (a) and (b) of this section, and in addition to the contracts ratified by subsection (f) of this section, the Secretary of Public Safety may enter into contracts with any public entity or any private nonprofit or for-profit firms for the confinement and care of State prisoners in any out-of-state correctional facility when to do so would most economically and effectively promote the purposes served by the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety. Contracts entered into under the authority of this subsection shall be for a period not to exceed two years and shall be renewable from time to time for a period not to exceed two years. Prisoners may be sent to out-of-state correctional facilities only when there are no available facilities in this State within the State prison system to appropriately house those prisoners. Any contract made under the authority of this subsection shall be approved by the Department of Administration before the contract is executed. Before expending more than the amount specifically appropriated by the General Assembly for the out-of-state housing of inmates, the Division shall obtain the approval of the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations and shall report such expenditures to the Chairs of the Senate and House Appropriations Committees, the Chairs of the Senate and House Appropriations Subcommittees on Justice and Public Safety, and the Chairs of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety.

Prisoners confined in out-of-state correctional facilities pursuant to subsection (c) of this section shall remain subject to the rules adopted for the conduct of persons committed to the State prison system. The rules regarding good time and gain time, discipline, classification, extension of the limits of confinement, transfers, housing arrangements, and eligibility for parole shall apply to inmates housed in those out-of-state correctional facilities. The operators of those out-of-state correctional facilities may promulgate any other rules as may be necessary for the operation of those facilities with the written approval of the Secretary of Public Safety. Custodial officials employed by an out-of-state correctional facility are agents of the Secretary of Public Safety and may use those procedures for use of force authorized by the Secretary of Public Safety not inconsistent with the laws of the State of situs of the facility to defend themselves, to enforce the observance of discipline in compliance with correctional facility rules, to secure the person of a prisoner, and to prevent escape. Prisoners confined to out-of-state correctional facilities may be required to perform reasonable work assignments within those facilities. Private firms under subsection (c) of this section shall employ inmate disciplinary and grievance policies of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety.

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 324, s. 19.10.

Any contracts entered into by the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety with public contractors prior to March 25, 1994, for the out-of-state housing of inmates are ratified.

The Secretary of Public Safety may contract with private for-profit or nonprofit firms for the provision and operation of four or more confinement facilities totaling up to 2,000 beds in the State to house State prisoners when to do so would most economically and effectively promote the purposes served by the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety. This 2,000-bed limitation shall not apply to the 500 beds in private substance abuse treatment centers authorized by the General Assembly prior to July 1, 1995. Whenever the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety determines that new prison facilities are required in addition to existing and planned facilities, the Division may contract for any remaining beds authorized by this section before constructing State-operated facilities.Contracts entered under the authority of this subsection shall be for a period not to exceed 10 years, shall be renewable from time to time for a period not to exceed 10 years. The Secretary of Public Safety shall enter contracts under this subsection only if funds are appropriated for this purpose by the General Assembly. Contracts entered under the authority of this subsection may be subject to any requirements for the location of the confinement facilities set forth by the General Assembly in appropriating those funds.Once the Division has made a determination to contract for additional private prison beds, it shall issue a request for proposals within 30 days of the decision. The request for proposals shall require bids to be submitted within two months, and the Division shall award contracts at the earliest practicable date after the submission of bids. The Secretary of Public Safety, in consultation with the Chairs of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety and the Chairs of the House and Senate Appropriations Subcommittees on Justice and Public Safety, shall make recommendations to the State Purchasing Officer on the final award decision. The State Purchasing Officer shall make the final award decision, and the contract shall then be subject to the approval of the Council of State after consultation with the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations.Contracts made under the authority of this subsection may provide the State with an option to purchase the confinement facility or may provide for the purchase of the confinement facility by the State. Contracts made under the authority of this subsection shall state that plans and specifications for private confinement facilities shall be furnished to and reviewed by the Office of State Construction. The Office of State Construction shall inspect and review each project during construction to ensure that the project is suitable for habitation and to determine whether the project would be suitable for future acquisition by the State. All contracts for the housing of State prisoners in private confinement facilities shall require a minimum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) of occurrence-based liability insurance and shall hold the State harmless and provide reimbursement for all liability arising out of actions caused by operations and employees of the private confinement facility.Prisoners housed in private confinement facilities pursuant to this subsection shall remain subject to the rules adopted for the conduct of persons committed to the State prison system. The Secretary of Public Safety may review and approve the design and construction of private confinement facilities before housing State prisoners in these facilities. The rules regarding good time, gain time, and earned credits, discipline, classification, extension of the limits of confinement, transfers, housing arrangements, and eligibility for parole shall apply to inmates housed in private confinement facilities pursuant to this subsection. The operators of private confinement facilities may adopt any other rules as may be necessary for the operation of those facilities with the written approval of the Secretary of Public Safety. Custodial officials employed by a private confinement facility are agents of the Secretary of Public Safety and may use those procedures for use of force authorized by the Secretary of Public Safety to defend themselves, to enforce the observance of discipline in compliance with confinement facility rules, to secure the person of a prisoner, and to prevent escape. Private firms under this subsection shall employ inmate disciplinary and grievance policies of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety.

Private confinement facilities under this section shall be designed, built, and operated in accordance with applicable State laws, court orders, fire safety codes, and local regulations.

The Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety shall make a written report no later than March 1 of every year, beginning in 1997, on the substance of all outstanding contracts for the housing of State prisoners entered into under the authority of this section. The report shall be submitted to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety.

History.

1933, c. 172, s. 19; 1957, c. 349, s. 10; 1967, c. 996, s. 8; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 1975, c. 879, s. 46; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1147, s. 34; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 16(a), (b); 1995, c. 324, s. 19.10(a), (b); c. 507, s. 19; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 20.18; 1997-443, ss. 21.4(c)-(e); 1999-237, s. 18.20(a); 2001-84, s. 1; 2001-138, s. 2; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2011-291, ss. 2.56-2.58; 2012-83, s. 61; 2015-241, s. 16C.10(a); 2017-186, s. 2(aaaaaaaa).

Cross References.

As to prohibition on private prisons housing out-of-state inmates, see

G.S. 148-37.1

.

§ 148-37.
Additional facilities authorized; contractual arrangements. [Effective January 1, 2023]

Subject to the provisions of

G.S. 143-341

, the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction may establish additional facilities for use by the Division, such facilities to be either of a permanent type of construction or of a temporary or movable type as the Division may find most advantageous to the particular needs, to the end that the prisoners under its supervision may be so distributed throughout the State as to facilitate individualization of treatment designed to prepare them for lawful living in the community where they are most likely to reside after their release from prison. For this purpose, the Division may purchase or lease sites and suitable lands adjacent thereto and erect necessary buildings thereon, or purchase or lease existing facilities, all within the limits of allotments as approved by the Department of Administration.

The Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction may contract with the proper official of the United States or of any county or city of this State for the confinement of federal prisoners after they have been sentenced, county, or city prisoners in facilities of the State prison system or for the confinement of State prisoners in any county or any city facility located in North Carolina, or any facility of the United States Bureau of Prisons, when to do so would most economically and effectively promote the purposes served by the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction. Except as otherwise provided, any contract made under the authority of this subsection shall be for a period of not more than two years, and shall be renewable from time to time for a period not to exceed two years. Contracts made under the authority of this subsection for the confinement of State prisoners in local or district confinement facilities may be for a period of not more than 10 years and renewable from time to time for a period not to exceed 10 years, and shall be subject to the approval of the Council of State and the Department of Administration after consultation with the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations. Contracts for receiving federal, county and city prisoners shall provide for reimbursing the State in full for all costs involved. The financial provisions shall have the approval of the Department of Administration before the contract is executed. Payments received under such contracts shall be deposited in the State treasury for the use of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction. Such payments are hereby appropriated to the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction as a supplementary fund to compensate for the additional care and maintenance of such prisoners as are received under such contracts.

(b1)

Recodified as

G.S. 148-37.2

by Session Laws 2001-84, s. 1, effective May 17, 2001.

In addition to the authority contained in subsections (a) and (b) of this section, and in addition to the contracts ratified by subsection (f) of this section, the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction may enter into contracts with any public entity or any private nonprofit or for-profit firms for the confinement and care of State prisoners in any out-of-state correctional facility when to do so would most economically and effectively promote the purposes served by the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction. Contracts entered into under the authority of this subsection shall be for a period not to exceed two years and shall be renewable from time to time for a period not to exceed two years. Prisoners may be sent to out-of-state correctional facilities only when there are no available facilities in this State within the State prison system to appropriately house those prisoners. Any contract made under the authority of this subsection shall be approved by the Department of Administration before the contract is executed. Before expending more than the amount specifically appropriated by the General Assembly for the out-of-state housing of inmates, the Division shall obtain the approval of the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations and shall report such expenditures to the Chairs of the Senate and House Appropriations Committees, the Chairs of the Senate and House Appropriations Subcommittees on Justice and Public Safety, and the Chairs of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety.

Prisoners confined in out-of-state correctional facilities pursuant to subsection (c) of this section shall remain subject to the rules adopted for the conduct of persons committed to the State prison system. The rules regarding good time and gain time, discipline, classification, extension of the limits of confinement, transfers, housing arrangements, and eligibility for parole shall apply to inmates housed in those out-of-state correctional facilities. The operators of those out-of-state correctional facilities may promulgate any other rules as may be necessary for the operation of those facilities with the written approval of the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction. Custodial officials employed by an out-of-state correctional facility are agents of the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction and may use those procedures for use of force authorized by the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction not inconsistent with the laws of the State of situs of the facility to defend themselves, to enforce the observance of discipline in compliance with correctional facility rules, to secure the person of a prisoner, and to prevent escape. Prisoners confined to out-of-state correctional facilities may be required to perform reasonable work assignments within those facilities. Private firms under subsection (c) of this section shall employ inmate disciplinary and grievance policies of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction.

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 324, s. 19.10.

Any contracts entered into by the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction with public contractors prior to March 25, 1994, for the out-of-state housing of inmates are ratified.

The Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction may contract with private for-profit or nonprofit firms for the provision and operation of four or more confinement facilities totaling up to 2,000 beds in the State to house State prisoners when to do so would most economically and effectively promote the purposes served by the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction. This 2,000-bed limitation shall not apply to the 500 beds in private substance abuse treatment centers authorized by the General Assembly prior to July 1, 1995. Whenever the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction determines that new prison facilities are required in addition to existing and planned facilities, the Division may contract for any remaining beds authorized by this section before constructing State-operated facilities.Contracts entered under the authority of this subsection shall be for a period not to exceed 10 years, shall be renewable from time to time for a period not to exceed 10 years. The Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction shall enter contracts under this subsection only if funds are appropriated for this purpose by the General Assembly. Contracts entered under the authority of this subsection may be subject to any requirements for the location of the confinement facilities set forth by the General Assembly in appropriating those funds.Once the Division has made a determination to contract for additional private prison beds, it shall issue a request for proposals within 30 days of the decision. The request for proposals shall require bids to be submitted within two months, and the Division shall award contracts at the earliest practicable date after the submission of bids. The Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction, in consultation with the Chairs of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety and the Chairs of the House and Senate Appropriations Subcommittees on Justice and Public Safety, shall make recommendations to the State Purchasing Officer on the final award decision. The State Purchasing Officer shall make the final award decision, and the contract shall then be subject to the approval of the Council of State after consultation with the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations.Contracts made under the authority of this subsection may provide the State with an option to purchase the confinement facility or may provide for the purchase of the confinement facility by the State. Contracts made under the authority of this subsection shall state that plans and specifications for private confinement facilities shall be furnished to and reviewed by the Office of State Construction. The Office of State Construction shall inspect and review each project during construction to ensure that the project is suitable for habitation and to determine whether the project would be suitable for future acquisition by the State. All contracts for the housing of State prisoners in private confinement facilities shall require a minimum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) of occurrence-based liability insurance and shall hold the State harmless and provide reimbursement for all liability arising out of actions caused by operations and employees of the private confinement facility.Prisoners housed in private confinement facilities pursuant to this subsection shall remain subject to the rules adopted for the conduct of persons committed to the State prison system. The Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction may review and approve the design and construction of private confinement facilities before housing State prisoners in these facilities. The rules regarding good time, gain time, and earned credits, discipline, classification, extension of the limits of confinement, transfers, housing arrangements, and eligibility for parole shall apply to inmates housed in private confinement facilities pursuant to this subsection. The operators of private confinement facilities may adopt any other rules as may be necessary for the operation of those facilities with the written approval of the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction. Custodial officials employed by a private confinement facility are agents of the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction and may use those procedures for use of force authorized by the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction to defend themselves, to enforce the observance of discipline in compliance with confinement facility rules, to secure the person of a prisoner, and to prevent escape. Private firms under this subsection shall employ inmate disciplinary and grievance policies of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction.

Private confinement facilities under this section shall be designed, built, and operated in accordance with applicable State laws, court orders, fire safety codes, and local regulations.

The Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction shall make a written report no later than March 1 of every year, beginning in 1997, on the substance of all outstanding contracts for the housing of State prisoners entered into under the authority of this section. The report shall be submitted to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety.

History.

1933, c. 172, s. 19; 1957, c. 349, s. 10; 1967, c. 996, s. 8; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 1975, c. 879, s. 46; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1147, s. 34; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 16(a), (b); 1995, c. 324, s. 19.10(a), (b); c. 507, s. 19; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 20.18; 1997-443, ss. 21.4(c)-(e); 1999-237, s. 18.20(a); 2001-84, s. 1; 2001-138, s. 2; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2011-291, ss. 2.56-2.58; 2012-83, s. 61; 2015-241, s. 16C.10(a); 2017-186, s. 2(aaaaaaaa); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p).

Cross References.

As to prohibition on private prisons housing out-of-state inmates, see

G.S. 148-37.1

.

§ 148-37.1.
Prohibition on private prisons housing out-of-state inmates.

Except as otherwise provided in this section or authorized by North Carolina law, no municipality, county, or private entity may authorize, construct, own, or operate any type of correctional facility for the confinement of inmates serving sentences for violation of the laws of a jurisdiction other than North Carolina.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to facilities owned or operated by the federal government and used exclusively for the confinement of inmates serving sentences for violation of federal law, but only to the extent that such facilities are not subject to restriction by the states under the provisions of the United States Constitution.

History.

2000-67, s. 16.3(a).

§ 148-37.2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 16C.10(b), effective July 1, 2015.

History.

1999-237, s. 18.20(a); 2001-84, s. 1; 2001-202, s. 1; 2003-284, s. 47.1; 2005-98, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); repealed by 2015-241, s. 16C.10(b), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 148-37.3.
Authority of private correctional officers employed pursuant to a contract with the Federal Bureau of Prisons. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

Correctional officers and security supervisors employed at private correctional facilities pursuant to a contract between their employer and the Federal Bureau of Prisons may, in the course of their employment as correctional officers or security supervisors, use necessary force and make arrests consistent with the laws applicable to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety, which force shall not exceed that authorized to Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety officers, provided that the employment policies of such private corporations meet the same minimum standards and practices followed by the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety in employing its correctional personnel, and if:

Those correctional officers and security supervisors have been certified as correctional officers as provided under Article 1 of Chapter 17C of the General Statutes; or

Those correctional officers and security supervisors employed by the private corporation at the facility have completed a training curriculum that meets or exceeds the standards required by the North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards Commission for correctional personnel.

Any private corporation described in subsection (a) of this section shall without limit defend, indemnify, and hold harmless the State, its officers, employees, and agents from any claims arising out of the operation of the private correctional facility, or the granting of the powers authorized under this section, including any attorneys’ fees or other legal costs incurred by the State, its officers, employees, or agents as a result of such claims.

Any private corporation described in subsection (a) of this section shall reimburse the State and any county or other law enforcement agency for the full cost of any additional expenses incurred by the State or the county or other law enforcement agency in connection with the pursuit and apprehension of an escaped inmate from the facility.In the event of an escape from the facility, any private corporation described in subsection (a) of this section shall immediately notify the sheriff in the county in which the facility is located, who shall cause an immediate entry into the Department of Public Safety’s Criminal Information Network. The sheriff of the county in which the facility is located shall be the lead law enforcement officer in connection with the pursuit and apprehension of an escaped inmate from the facility.

Any private corporation described in subsection (a) of this section must maintain in force liability insurance to satisfy any final judgment rendered against the private corporation or the State, its officers, employees, and agents that arises out of the operation of the correctional facility or the indemnification requirements in subsection (b) of this section. The minimum amount of liability insurance that will be required under this section is ten million dollars ($10,000,000) per occurrence, and twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) aggregate per occurrence.

Repealed by Session Laws 2007-162, s. 1, effective July 1, 2007.

The authority set forth in this section to use necessary force and make arrests shall be in addition to any existing authority set forth in the statutory or common law of the State, but shall not exceed the authority to use necessary force and make arrests set out in subsection (a) of this section.

A private corporation described in subsection (a) of this section shall bear the reasonable costs of services provided by the State, its officers, employees, and agents for the corporation. The amount of the costs shall be determined by the member of the Council of State or Cabinet member of the agency or department that provided the services.

This section is effective August 18, 2001 and applies to private correctional facilities and the employees of those correctional facilities constructed and contracted to be operated by August 18, 2001.

History.

2001-378, ss. 1-7; 2003-351, s. 1; 2007-162, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2012-83, s. 61; 2014-100, s. 17.1(lll); 2017-186, s. 2(bbbbbbbb).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 148-37.3

.

§ 148-37.3.
Authority of private correctional officers employed pursuant to a contract with the Federal Bureau of Prisons. [Effective January 1, 2023]

Correctional officers and security supervisors employed at private correctional facilities pursuant to a contract between their employer and the Federal Bureau of Prisons may, in the course of their employment as correctional officers or security supervisors, use necessary force and make arrests consistent with the laws applicable to the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction, which force shall not exceed that authorized to Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction officers, provided that the employment policies of such private corporations meet the same minimum standards and practices followed by the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction in employing its correctional personnel, and if:

Those correctional officers and security supervisors have been certified as correctional officers as provided under Article 1 of Chapter 17C of the General Statutes; or

Those correctional officers and security supervisors employed by the private corporation at the facility have completed a training curriculum that meets or exceeds the standards required by the North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards Commission for correctional personnel.

Any private corporation described in subsection (a) of this section shall without limit defend, indemnify, and hold harmless the State, its officers, employees, and agents from any claims arising out of the operation of the private correctional facility, or the granting of the powers authorized under this section, including any attorneys’ fees or other legal costs incurred by the State, its officers, employees, or agents as a result of such claims.

Any private corporation described in subsection (a) of this section shall reimburse the State and any county or other law enforcement agency for the full cost of any additional expenses incurred by the State or the county or other law enforcement agency in connection with the pursuit and apprehension of an escaped inmate from the facility.In the event of an escape from the facility, any private corporation described in subsection (a) of this section shall immediately notify the sheriff in the county in which the facility is located, who shall cause an immediate entry into the Department of Public Safety’s Criminal Information Network. The sheriff of the county in which the facility is located shall be the lead law enforcement officer in connection with the pursuit and apprehension of an escaped inmate from the facility.

Any private corporation described in subsection (a) of this section must maintain in force liability insurance to satisfy any final judgment rendered against the private corporation or the State, its officers, employees, and agents that arises out of the operation of the correctional facility or the indemnification requirements in subsection (b) of this section. The minimum amount of liability insurance that will be required under this section is ten million dollars ($10,000,000) per occurrence, and twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) aggregate per occurrence.

Repealed by Session Laws 2007-162, s. 1, effective July 1, 2007.

The authority set forth in this section to use necessary force and make arrests shall be in addition to any existing authority set forth in the statutory or common law of the State, but shall not exceed the authority to use necessary force and make arrests set out in subsection (a) of this section.

A private corporation described in subsection (a) of this section shall bear the reasonable costs of services provided by the State, its officers, employees, and agents for the corporation. The amount of the costs shall be determined by the member of the Council of State or Cabinet member of the agency or department that provided the services.

This section is effective August 18, 2001 and applies to private correctional facilities and the employees of those correctional facilities constructed and contracted to be operated by August 18, 2001.

History.

2001-378, ss. 1-7; 2003-351, s. 1; 2007-162, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2012-83, s. 61; 2014-100, s. 17.1(lll); 2017-186, s. 2(bbbbbbbb); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 148-37.3

.

§§ 148-38,
148-39.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1957, c. 349, s. 11.

§ 148-40.
Recapture of escaped prisoners. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The rules and regulations for the government of the State prison system may provide for the recapture of convicts that may escape, or any convicts that may have escaped from the State’s prison or prison camps, or county road camps of this State, and the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety may pay to any person recapturing an escaped convict such reward or expense of recapture as the regulations may provide. Any citizen of North Carolina shall have authority to apprehend any convict who may escape before the expiration of his term of imprisonment whether he be guilty of a felony or misdemeanor, and retain him in custody and deliver him to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety.

History.

1933, c. 172, s. 21; 1955, c. 238, s. 8; 1957, c. 349, s. 10; 1967, c. 996, s. 13; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2012-83, s. 61; 2017-186, s. 2(cccccccc).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 148-40

.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(hhhh), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(cccccccc), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” throughout the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(hhhh), substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” in the first and last sentences; and, in the last sentence, substituted “the convict’s term” for “his term”, substituted “the convict be” for “he be” and substituted “the convict to” for “him to.” For effective date and applicability, see editor’s note.